Hawaii statutes.
§576D-13 Suspension or denial of licenses.
(a) Upon a determination that an obligor is not in compliance with an order of
support as defined in section 576D-1 or that an individual failed to comply
with a subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding,
and that the obligor or individual is the holder of or an applicant for a
license issued by a licensing authority in this State, the agency shall serve
notice upon the obligor or individual of the agency's intent to certify the obligor
or individual as noncompliant with an order of support or a subpoena or warrant
relating to a paternity or child support proceeding, which shall direct the
appropriate licensing authority to deny or suspend the license, or to deny the
application for renewal, reinstatement, or restoration of such license.

(b) The notice shall be sent by regular mail
to both the last known address of record of the obligor or individual as shown
in the records of the licensing authority and the address of record of the
obligor or individual as shown in the agency's child support record. For
purposes of this section, the date of service means two days following the date
of mailing. The notice shall contain the following information:

(1) Identification of the license, certificate,
permit, or registration subject to suspension, nonrenewal, nonreinstatement,
nonrestoration, or denial;

(2) The name, social security number, if available,
date of birth, if known, and each applicable child support case number or
numbers of the obligor or individual;

(3) The amount of the arrears, the amount of the
monthly child support obligation, and reference to the support order upon which
the support amount and arrears are based or the subpoena or warrant that the
individual has failed to comply with;

(4) A statement that the obligor or individual may
contest the suspension, nonrenewal, nonreinstatement, nonrestoration, or denial
of a license by requesting a hearing in writing within thirty days of the date
of service of the notice of intent to suspend, not renew, not reinstate, not
restore, or deny the license;

(5) A statement that the obligor may contact the
agency in writing within thirty days of the date of service of the notice and
enter into a monthly payment agreement for the arrears owed, and if an
agreement is entered into within thirty days of making contact with the agency,
the agency shall not pursue the suspension, nonrenewal, nonreinstatement,
nonrestoration, or denial of the license;

(6) A statement that an individual not in compliance
with a subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding
may contact the agency in writing within thirty days of the date of service of
the notice and enter into an agreement to provide the information or appear at
the proceedings, and if so, the agency shall not pursue the suspension,
nonrenewal, nonreinstatement, nonrestoration, or denial of the license; and

(7) A statement that if the obligor or individual
makes a timely request as specified in paragraph (4), the agency shall stay the
action until a decision is made.

(c) The agency shall certify in writing to the
licensing authority that the obligor is not in compliance with an order of
support, or that the individual is not in compliance with a subpoena or warrant
relating to a paternity or child support proceeding, and shall authorize the
immediate suspension, nonrenewal, nonreinstatement, nonrestoration, or denial
of any license held or applied for by the obligor or individual if the obligor
or individual:

(1) Fails to contact the agency in writing within
thirty days of the date of service of the notice;

(2) Is not in compliance with an order of support, or
failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a paternity or child
support proceeding, and does not timely enter into an agreement under
subsection (d); or

(3) Is delinquent in making periodic payments on a
support arrearage pursuant to a written agreement with the child support
enforcement agency under subsection (d).

The agency shall provide a copy of the
certification to the obligor or individual. Upon receipt of the certification,
the licensing authority shall suspend any license that the obligor or
individual holds or deny any license for which the obligor or individual
applies without further review or hearing concerning the suspension,
nonrenewal, nonreinstatement, nonrestoration, or denial. Notwithstanding the
provisions of any other law setting terms of suspension, revocation, denial,
termination, or renewal, reinstatement, or restoration of a license, a
certification issued by the agency suspending, not renewing, not reinstating,
not restoring, or denying a license shall be implemented by the licensing
authority and continue in effect until the licensing authority receives a
written release of suspension or denial from the agency, the office of child
support hearings, or the family court.

(d) The obligor may enter into a payment
agreement with the agency if the obligor makes contact with the agency within
thirty days of the date of service of the notice, or the individual may either
enter into an agreement to provide the information requested in the subpoena or
appear at the proceeding required by the warrant.

(e) If the obligor or the individual requests
an administrative hearing in writing within thirty days of the date of service
of the notice as provided in subsection (b), the office shall schedule a
hearing to determine whether the obligor is not in compliance with a support
order or whether the individual is not in compliance with a subpoena or warrant
relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. The hearing shall be
conducted in accordance with chapters 91 and 576E. The issues before the
hearings officer shall be limited to whether the obligor is in compliance with
an order of support or whether the individual is in compliance with a subpoena
or warrant relating to a paternity or child support proceeding. The hearings
officer shall issue a written decision within ten days of the hearing. If the
hearings officer decides that the obligor is not in compliance with a support
order or that the individual is not in compliance with a subpoena or warrant
relating to a paternity or child support proceeding, the license held or
applied for by the obligor or individual shall be denied or suspended and shall
not be renewed, reinstated, or restored.

(f) The decision of the hearings officer shall
be final and shall be subject to judicial review as provided in chapter 91.
Any suspension or denial under this section shall not be stayed pending
judicial review.

(g) Upon receipt of the decision of the
hearings officer that the obligor is not in compliance with a support order or
that the individual is not in compliance with a subpoena or warrant relating to
a paternity or child support proceeding, the agency shall certify in writing to
the licensing authority that the obligor is not in compliance with an order of
support, or that the individual is not in compliance with a subpoena or warrant
relating to a paternity or child support proceeding, and shall authorize the
immediate suspension, nonrenewal, nonreinstatement, nonrestoration, or denial
of any license held or applied for by the obligor or individual. The agency
shall provide a copy of the certification to the obligor or individual. Upon
receipt of the certification, the licensing authority shall suspend any license
that the obligor or individual holds or deny any license for which the obligor
or individual applies without further review or hearing concerning the
suspension, nonrenewal, nonreinstatement, nonrestoration, or denial.
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law setting terms of suspension,
revocation, denial, termination, or renewal, reinstatement, or restoration of a
license, a certification issued by the agency suspending, not renewing, not
reinstating, not restoring, or denying a license shall be implemented by the
licensing authority and continue in effect until the licensing authority
receives a written release of suspension or denial from the agency, the office of
child support hearings, or the family court.

(h) When the conditions that resulted in the
suspension, nonrenewal, nonreinstatement, nonrestoration, or denial no longer
exist, the agency shall provide the obligor or individual with written
confirmation that the obligor is in compliance with the order of support or
that the individual is in compliance with the subpoena or warrant relating to a
paternity or child support proceeding, and the agency, office, or the family
court shall issue an authorization canceling the certification in writing to
the licensing authority.

(i) If a license is suspended or denied under
this section, any funds paid by the obligor or individual to the licensing
authority shall not be refunded by the licensing authority, and the licensing
authority may charge a fee for reinstating or restoring a license. The
licensing authority may also charge the obligor or individual a reasonable fee
to cover the administrative costs incurred by the licensing authority in
complying with this section.

(j) The agency shall adopt rules necessary for
the implementation and administration of this section. The licensing authority
shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation and administration of this
section. The appropriate licensing authority shall require that the social
security number of any applicant for a professional license, driver's license,
occupational license, recreational license, or marriage license be recorded on
the application for those licenses. The social security number shall be used
solely for purposes of this chapter for child support enforcement and
identification. [L 1997, c 293, pt of §6; am L 1998, c 83, §4; am L 2001, c 95,
§2; am L 2006, c 43, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next